Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-401.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 28-401 to 28-456.01 and 28-458 to 28-476 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 98;

R.S.1943, (1995), § 28-438;

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 117, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1120;

Laws 2011, LB20, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB390, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1009, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB487, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB931, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1152, § 15.